apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON NP-TOP-CLUSTER

:%{і%} NP-TOP ;
NP-TOP ;  ! Dir/LR ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;             ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate without -

LEXICON NP-COG-COMMON

%<attr%>: # ;
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COG-COMMON ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-F

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: NP-COG-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-MF

NP-ANT-M ;
NP-ANT-F ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич - their feminine equivalets end with -вна

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>: N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>:%- N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON NAT
! Nationalities

ADJ ;             ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]"
N-INFL ;          ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish"
%>ч%{A%} N-INFL ; ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ; ! Added <subst>

LEXICON NUM-ITG

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-AL-PL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

# ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;        ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# жақсырақ іс
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# жақсыны таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к SUBST ;  !# жақсырақты таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к SUBST ;       ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;    !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;         ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# татыктуу

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# татыктуу адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# татыктуураак ага караганда
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# чыныгы наамга татыктууну издейли
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к SUBST ;  !# "пайгамбардын биринчи ордун басуучулук милдетине барынан татыктуураагы Абу Бакр (р.а.) экендигин билдиришет."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к SUBST ;       ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жок);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# example 2
                                                      !# example 3

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# улуттук

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# улуттук тамак


LEXICON A5                 ! adjectives with comparative reading only;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.comp>
                           !# кеңири

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# кеңири
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# продукция үчүн кеңирирээк рыноктор ачылат
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# example 2
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# example 3



LEXICON CLIT

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON SUBST

SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON DAGI

%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;  ! Use/Circ  !! FIXME: when we go recursie, uncomment
%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CASES ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON V-ADJ

ATTR ;
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ATTR

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ;
%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: ADVL ;
%<adj%>: V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ATTR ;
%<subst%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-KI

%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON IRREGULAR-KI

%<adv%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;
ADV-ABL ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-ABL ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL-REG

ADV ;
ADV-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI

ADV-ABL ;           ! Dir/LR
ADV-WITH-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL-REG

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADVL

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: ADVL ;

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: V-CLIT ;

LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: POSSESSION ;
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM-L

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-PL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GEN-POS ; ! was CASES-ETC
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
же:же CC ; ! "or"
а:а CC ; ! "but/and"
эгерде CS ; ! conjunction like word "if"
болуп:болуп CS ; ! Dir/RL ""    ! Huh?
деп CS ; ! Use/MT
ошондуктан:ошондуктан CA ;
кандай% болсо% да:кандай% болсо% да CA ;
LEXICON Postpositions
үчүн:үчүн POST-DECL ; ! "for" +nom
тиешелүү:тиешелүү POST ; ! "belonging to" +dat
сыңары:сыңары POST ;
сыяктуу:сыяктуу POST-DECL ;
LEXICON Determiners
ошол:ошол DET-DEM-L ; ! "that"
ушул:ушул DET-DEM-L ; ! "this (visible)"
ал:ал DET-DEM ; ! "that"
мына% бу:мына% бу DET-DEM ; ! ""
эчбир:эчбир DET-IND ; ! "no"
каалаган:каалаган DET-IND ; ! "any"
бир% далай:бир% далай DET-QNT ;
миллиондогон:миллиондогон DET-QNT ;
өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"
LEXICON Pronouns
ал%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:аныкыча CLIT ;
сиздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:сиздерче CLIT ;
LEXICON Numerals
тогуз:тогуз NUM ; ! "nine"
сексен:сексен NUM ; ! "eighty"
онтогуз:онтогуз NUM ; ! "nineteen"
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
нече:нече NUM-ITG ;
канча:канча NUM-ITG ;
LEXICON Nouns
испан:испан NAT ; ! "Spanish"
англис:англис NAT ; ! "English"
француз:француз NAT ; ! "French"  ! FIXME
LEXICON ProperNouns
Америка% Кошмо% Штаттары:Америка% Кошмо% Штаттар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "United States of America"
ВДР:ВДР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! "Vietnam Democratic Republic"
Донецк:Донецк NP-TOP-CLUSTER ;
ЕБ:ЕБ%{э%} NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "European Union"
Уральск:Уральск NP-TOP-CLUSTER ; ! "Uralsk"
Тобольск:Тобольск NP-TOP-CLUSTER ; ! ""
Советтер% Союзу:Советтер% Союз NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Soviet Union"
KazakhGold:KazakhGold NP-ORG ; ! ""
Гардиан:Гардиан NP-ORG ; ! ""
Twitter:Twitter NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
YouTube:YouTube NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Getty% Images:Getty% Images%{э%}%{з%} NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Атлант:Атлант NP-AL ; ! ""
Лада:Лада NP-AL ; ! ""
Жебрейил:Жебрейил NP-AL ; ! ""
Совет:Совет NP-AL-PL ; ! ""
Байер% Мюнхен:Байер% Мюнхен NP-ORG ; ! "FC Bayern München"
Аселхан:Аселхан NP-ANT-F ; ! "Äselxan"
Бексейит:Бексейит NP-ANT-M ; ! "Bekseyit" (Arabic)
Дилбара:Дилбара NP-ANT-F ; ! "Dilbara" (Persian)
Жолдасали:Жолдасали NP-ANT-M ; ! "Joldasäli" (Kazakh)
Разия:Разия NP-ANT-F ; ! "Räzıya" (Arabic)
Уитнесс:Уитнесс NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Чжин:Чжин NP-ANT-MF ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Павлович:Павло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! FIXME: not patronym
Никитченко:Никитченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Дурнев:Дурнев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ильин:Ильин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Лапин:Лапин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Лекеров:Лекеров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Сафонов:Сафонов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Сорокин:Сорокин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Асанов:Асанов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Каримов:Каримов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Шүкүров:Шүкүров NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Орузбаева:Орузбаева NP-COG-F ;
Отунбаева:Отунбаева NP-COG-F ;
Бен% Ладен:Бен% Ладен NP-COG-MF ;
Медведев:Медведев NP-COG-MF ;
LEXICON Adjectives
катардуу:катардуу A4 ; ! ""
практикалык:практикалык A4 ; ! ""
химиялык:химиялык A4 ; ! ""
атактуу:атактуу A3 ; ! ""
инвестициялык:инвестициялык A3 ; ! ""
чечүүчү:чечүүчү A3 ; ! "A3 version used very few"
жат:жат A2 ; ! ""
нымдуу:нымдуу A2 ; ! "have not seen the substantive form of this, so the nearest category is A2 because it has comp. form"
кем:кем A1 ; ! "FIXME not sure about this adj"
түшүнүктүү:түшүнүктүү A1 ; ! "understandable"
сынчы:сынчы A1 ; ! "FIXME is it noun?"
системалуу:системалуу A5 ; ! "" ! "comp form used very few"
ишеничтүү:ишеничтүү A5 ; ! ""
ным:ным A5 ; ! "FIXME check this"
бир% түрдүү:бир% түрдүү A6 ; ! ""
жалгыз:жалгыз A6 ; ! ""
жийиркенич:жийиркенич A6 ; ! "FIXME not sure about the category"
жинденген:жинденген ADJ ;
кынтыксыз:кынтыксыз ADJ ;
фашист:фашист ADJ ;
көөнө:көөнө A2 ; ! "old" ! FIXME: CHECK A2 (seems to have comp forms, cf. google)
LEXICON Adverbs
кандай:кандай ADVITG ; ! "how"
канчалык:канчалык ADVITG ; ! ""
бир:бир ADV ;
эчактан% бери:эчактан% бери ADV ; ! ""
андан% кийин:андан% кийин ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! ""
мурда:мурда ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "long-ago"
жаңы% эле:жаңы% эле ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "just now"
эртең% менен:эртең% менен ADV-ABL-REG ; ! "morning      ! Dir/LR
бери:бери ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "nearer"
бери:бер ADV-KI ; ! "nearer"
акыры:акыры ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "at last"
акыры:акыр ADV-KI ; ! "previous; last"
илгери:илгер ADV-ABL ; ! "ancient"
эми:эми ADV-WITH-ABL ;
эми:эмди ADV-WITH-KI ; ! dialectal form    ! Dir/LR
эми:эмди ADV-ABL-REG ; ! dialectal form    ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кече%>ки IRREGULAR-KI ;       ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кечээ%>ки IRREGULAR-KI ;      ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Abbreviations
жж%.:жж%. ABBR ;
м²:м² ABBR ; ! "m²"
